Maine, session 132, LD1450.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §60, sub-§3, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 301, §1, is amended
to read:
B. Is limited to a term of not less than 20 10 years.
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §60-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2007, c. 693, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. Program. In The Voluntary Municipal Farm Support Program is established in
order to protect and support local farms, preserve farmland and reduce the potential tax
burdens from new development fiscal burden for participating municipalities that results
from new development in rural areas. Under this program, a municipality may enter into
farm support arrangements with the owners of qualified farmland.
A. A farm support arrangement must be approved by majority vote of the
municipality’s legislative body or municipal officers or by a municipal employee
appointed by the municipal officers and designated to review and approve farm support
arrangements.
B. Unless approved by a 2/3 vote of the municipality’s legislative body, the
municipality may not enter into farm support arrangements:
(1) Affecting more than 3% of the total annual valuation of taxable land in the
municipality; and or
(2) In any calendar year, affecting more than 1% of the total annual valuation of
taxable land in the municipality.
Sec. 3. 7 MRSA §60-A, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2007, c. 301, §1, is amended to
read:
4. Rules. The department shall adopt rules governing farm support arrangements.
Rules adopted under this subsection are major substantive routine technical rules as defined
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Page 1 - 132LR1755(03)